District of Columbia statutes.
8-109.12

Fees.

Whenever the Mayor reviews an environmental impact screening form or prepares, or causes to be prepared, an EIS or supplemental EIS under this subchapter, the Mayor may impose a fee on the applicant to compensate the Mayor for the costs of reviewing the environmental impact screening form or preparing the EIS or supplemental EIS.

Oct. 18, 1989, D.C. Law 8-36, § 11b
as added Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 6062(b), 57 DCR 6242
Asbestos workers, scope of practice, see § 47-2853.51.
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 6062(b) of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).